West Virginia, session 2026, HB5245.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 18C. STUDENT LOANS; SCHOLARSHIPS AND STATE AID. 1. Financial Assistance generally §18C-1-4a. Governor's Cup Challenge. (a) The "Governor's Cup Challenge" is hereby created to provide scholarships for high school student-athletes who participated in high school athletic extracurricular activities but did not receive an athletic scholarship to an in-state institution of higher education, and who are pursuing an education at the institution.(b) The Governor's Cup Challenge shall consist of athletic contests between Marshall University and West Virginia University in athletic programs in which both colleges compete within Division 1, NCAA competition. These contests shall be played on an annual basis. The location of the athletic contests shall be agreed upon by both institutions and included as part of the athletic team's regular athletic calendar. The location of each athletic contest shall rotate annually between the two institutions and may also be hosted at other locations around the state upon agreement by both institutions. (c) Each athletic contest won shall earn one point for the winning institution. The institution with the most points at the end of the year shall be named the winner of the Governor's Cup Challenge.(d) Twenty percent of the total net profits from ticket sales, merchandise sales, concession sales, and other game-related revenue shall be deposited, at least annually, by each institution into the "West Virginia Athlete Scholarship Fund" which is hereby created. The annual Governor's Cup Challenge champion will annually receive 65 percent of the balance of the fund to use for scholarships at their institution for in-state high school athletes. The other institution shall annually receive 35 percent of the fund for scholarships at their institution for in-state high school athletes. (e) The Governor's Cup Challenge and the West Virginia Athlete Scholarship Fund shall be overseen and monitored by the vice chancellor for administration as provided for in §18C-1-1 of this code.